Alabama, session 2026rs, SB316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
36 Section 1. For purposes of this act, the following
37 terms have the following meanings:
38 (1) FACILITY. A criminal correctional and detention
39 facility.
40 (2) INMATE. An individual convicted of a crime and
41 sentenced to a term of confinement of more than a one-year
42 duration.
43 (3) OVERSIGHT BOARD. The Corrections Oversight Board
44 created by the Legislature to oversee the prison oversight
45 coordinator.
46 (4) PERMANENTLY INCAPACITATED INMATE. A state inmate
47 who possesses a permanent, irreversible physical or mental
48 health condition that prevents him or her from being able to
49 perpetrate a violent physical action upon another person or
50 self or initiate or participate in a criminal act. The medical
51 or mental health treatment or need for assistance of such
52 individual requires daily assistance from a caretaker or a
53 long-term skilled medical or rehabilitation center to perform
54 or assist with activities of daily living, such as ambulation,
55 dressing, and bathing, or requires medications or treatments,
56 such as hemodialysis, to sustain life which require regular
Page 2

such as hemodialysis, to sustain life which require regular
SB316 INTRODUCED
57 diagnostic tests to monitor therapeutic effectiveness.
58 (5) PRISON OVERSIGHT COORDINATOR. The individual
59 employed within the Department of Examiners of Public Accounts
60 to assist in the coordination of the operations of the Joint
61 Prison Oversight Committee and its staff.
62 Section 2. (a) The Office of Prison Oversight
63 Coordinator is created within the Alabama Department of
64 Examiners of Public Accounts to assist the Joint Prison
65 Oversight Committee. The office shall be under the supervision
66 of the Prison Oversight Coordinator who shall be appointed by
67 the Chief Examiner of the Department of Public Accounts. The
68 chief examiner may employ up to two additional employees to
69 assist performing the duties of the office.
70 (b) The Office of Prison Oversight Coordinator shall do
71 all of the following:
72 (1) Monitor the occurrence of systemic issues within
73 the Department of Corrections which negatively impact the
74 health, safety, welfare, and rehabilitation of individuals in
75 the custody of the department.
76 (2) Monitor the safety and retention of correctional
77 officers and staff.
78 (3) Provide recommendations to effectively reduce the
79 department's risk of exposure to litigation.
80 (4) Report all findings to the Corrections Oversight
81 Board and the Joint Legislative Prison Oversight Committee
82 along with recommendations for improved outcomes.
83 (c) The Alabama Department of Examiners of Public
84 Accounts shall designate permanent office space for the use of
Page 3

Accounts shall designate permanent office space for the use of
SB316 INTRODUCED
85 the office of prison oversight coordinator. The permanent
86 office space shall not be located within the Department of
87 Corrections.
88 (d) The warden or other administrator of each
89 correctional facility of the Department of Corrections shall
90 designate suitable temporary workspace within the facility for
91 the prison oversight coordinator to freely conduct work or
92 meet with staff and inmates.
93 Section 3. (a) The prison oversight coordinator shall
94 conduct an initial inspection of all close and medium
95 correctional facilities of the department within 18 months of
96 the effective date of this act and all other correctional
97 facilities of the department within 24 months of the effective
98 date of this act. The prison oversight coordinator shall
99 conduct subsequent inspections of each such correctional
100 facility on a staggered basis as determined by the
101 correctional facility's safety and compliance classification
102 to assess all of the following:
103 (1) A summary of and compliance indicators for all
104 current facility policies and procedures governing inmate
105 care.
106 (2) Conditions of confinement.
107 (3) Availability of educational, rehabilitative and
108 reentry programming, drug and mental health treatment, and
109 inmate job and vocational training.
110 (4) All inmate visitation policies and procedures.
111 (5) All facilities designated to provide medical care
112 and the medical procedures and policies.
Page 4

and the medical procedures and policies.
SB316 INTRODUCED
113 (6) All current facility lockdown procedures and data,
114 and during initial assessment, the lockdown procedures and
115 data covering the previous three years.
116 (7) All the facility staffing plans, including, but not
117 limited to, the total number of jobs assigned to each
118 correctional staff, the ratio of staff to inmates at the
119 facility, the post charts for each facility, and the total
120 number of staff vacancies.
121 (8) All data for physical assaults, sexual assaults,
122 and use of force by correctional officers.
123 (9) All data for criminal charges or civil lawsuits
124 against correctional officers and staff, disciplinary action,
125 and any subsequent actions taken by the department, local
126 district attorney, and any other relevant party.
127 (10) During initial assessment, inmate and staff deaths
128 which occurred during the previous three years.
129 (11) The number of inmates who qualify as permanently
130 incapacitated.
131 (12) The number of submissions received by the
132 department's Constituent Services Unit from the facility and
133 how many were resolved.
134 (13) Any other facility operations the prison oversight
135 coordinator deems necessary.
136 (b) Within 90 days of completion of an inspection, the
137 prison oversight coordinator shall assign the facility a
138 safety and compliance classification. This classification
139 shall be divided into three tiers as follows:
140 (1) Tier 1 requires a subsequent inspection within 12
Page 5

(1) Tier 1 requires a subsequent inspection within 12
SB316 INTRODUCED
141 months and is used to classify maximum security facilities and
142 facilities that present clear violations of rights, risks to
143 the safety of inmates or staff, or severe lack of quality
144 programming for the successful rehabilitation of inmates.
145 (2) Tier 2 requires a subsequent inspection within 18
146 to 24 months and is used to classify facilities that may have
147 violations of rights, substandard conditions of confinement,
148 or substandard programming options.
149 (3) Tier 3 requires a subsequent inspection within 18
150 to 36 months and is used to classify facilities that have
151 adequate confinement conditions and appropriate programming
152 options.
153 (c) Within 90 days after the completion of an
154 inspection and designation of a safety and compliance
155 classification for a correctional facility, the prison
156 oversight coordinator shall produce a report to the Governor,
157 Corrections Oversight Board, and Joint Prison Oversight
158 Committee accurately describing inspection findings, the
159 safety and compliance classification designation, and
160 recommendations for remedial actions. The prison oversight
161 coordinator shall also provide a copy of the report to the
162 Commissioner of the Department of Corrections, Attorney
163 General, Senate Judiciary Committee, and House Judiciary
164 Committee. The prison oversight coordinator shall make the
165 report public by posting it on the publicly accessible website
166 of the Department of Examiners of Public Accounts after
167 redacting all personally identifiable information.
168 (d) The prison oversight coordinator's report shall
Page 6

(d) The prison oversight coordinator's report shall
SB316 INTRODUCED
169 include all of the following with respect to the correctional
170 facility:
171 (1) A summary of and a compliance indicator for each
172 facility's inmate care policies and procedures.
173 (2) A description of conditions of confinement.
174 (3) A catalog of available education and rehabilitative
175 programming, drug and mental health treatment, and inmate jobs
176 and vocational training.
177 (4) A summary of lockdown data.
178 (5) A summary of visitation policies and procedures.
179 (6) A list of available medical facilities and a
180 summary of the policies and procedures for each.
181 (7) The number of available staff for each facility and
182 a summary of existing policies regarding staff recruitment,
183 training, supervision, and discipline.
184 (8) A summary of physical assaults, sexual assaults,
185 and use of force incidents reviewed by the office.
186 (9) A summary of inmate and staff deaths that occurred
187 at the facility.
188 (10) The number of the population of permanently
189 incapacitated inmates pursuant to the Alabama Medical Furlough
190 Act, Section 14-14-2.
191 (11) A summary of any State Bureau of Investigations
192 (SBI) investigations of the facility.
193 (12) Recommendations for the improvement of safety and
194 facility conditions, rehabilitative and educational programs
195 and services, or ability of inmates to communicate with their
196 families.
Page 7

families.
SB316 INTRODUCED
197 (13) The recommended safety and compliance
198 classification for the facility and a timeline for the next
199 inspection.
200 (e) The Department of Corrections shall respond in
201 writing to each report issued by the prison oversight
202 coordinator within 30 days of issuance of the report, and the
203 response shall include a corrective action plan. The prison
204 oversight coordinator may conduct subsequent monitoring visits
205 as necessary.
206 (f) The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections
207 shall take any necessary actions to ensure the prison
208 oversight coordinator has access to enter any correctional
209 facility at any reasonable time to perform official duties
210 pursuant to this act. For purposes of this subsection, the
211 commissioner shall ensure the prison oversight coordinator may
212 do all of the following:
213 (1) Enter any correctional facility and confidentially
214 interview any inmate, department employee, department
215 contractor, or employees of other organizations or groups who
216 visit the facilities or conduct business at the facilities.
217 (2)a. Have the opportunity to regularly meet and
218 communicate privately and confidentially with inmates and
219 staff, including by private and confidential calls and mail.
220 b. The prison oversight coordinator shall have the sole
221 discretion to determine the appropriate method of
222 communication with inmates.
223 (3) Have reasonable access to all correctional
224 facilities of the department, including, but not limited to,
Page 8

facilities of the department, including, but not limited to,
SB316 INTRODUCED
225 all areas used by inmates, all areas accessible to inmates,
226 and inmate program areas at reasonable times, which at a
227 minimum must include normal business hours and visiting hours.
228 (4) Inform inmates of their rights and provide them
229 with information available through the office of prison
230 oversight coordinator.
231 (5) Monitor compliance with state and federal laws
232 governing the rights and safety of inmates.
233 (6)a. Inspect, view, photograph, and video record all
234 areas of the facility which are used by inmates or are
235 accessible to inmates.
236 b. All photographs taken and video recordings made by
237 the prison oversight coordinator which contain information
238 that identifies an incarcerated individual shall be treated as
239 confidential and exempt from public disclosure.
240 (7)a. Access, inspect, and copy all relevant
241 information, records, and documents in the possession and
242 control of the department.
243 b. The department shall assist in obtaining the
244 necessary releases for restricted confidential or privileged
245 documents. Upon receipt of a written request for access or
246 copies of department records, the department must provide the
247 access to or copies of the requested documentation by no later
248 than 10 business days from receipt of the request. For any
249 requested record regarding an inmate's death, threats of
250 bodily harm, including, but not limited to, sexual or physical
251 assaults or the denial of necessary medical treatment, the
252 department shall produce the records within three days unless
Page 9

department shall produce the records within three days unless
SB316 INTRODUCED
253 the position consents to an extension of time.
254 (g) When taking any action authorized pursuant to
255 subsection (f), the prison oversight coordinator shall
256 collaborate with the department to minimize disruptions to the
257 operations of the department and shall comply with the
258 department's security clearance protocols to the extent those
259 protocols do not unreasonably impede the activities outlined
260 in this section.
261 (h) The prison oversight coordinator shall consult with
262 the Alabama Department of Examiners of Public Accounts to
263 assist in the interpretation of the financial records of the
264 Department of Corrections. The prison oversight coordinator
265 may also request the Alabama Department of Examiners of Public
266 Accounts to perform an audit of the Department of Corrections
267 upon a reasonable belief that financial waste, fraud, or
268 impropriety has occurred.
269 (i) All correspondence and communication to or from the
270 prison oversight coordinator shall be deemed confidential and
271 shall be provided the same protection as privileged and legal
272 correspondence or communication.
273 (j) Members of the Legislature may consult with the
274 office of prison oversight coordinator regarding
275 communications received from constituents about conditions
276 within correctional facilities.
277 (1) The office of prison oversight coordinator shall
278 establish confidentiality rules and procedures for all
279 information received and maintained.
280 (2) The office of prison oversight coordinator shall
Page 10

(2) The office of prison oversight coordinator shall
SB316 INTRODUCED
281 treat all matters under review, including identities of
282 recipients of monitor services, complaints, and identities of
283 individuals from whom information is acquired, as
284 confidential, except to the extent disclosure may be necessary
285 to facilitate the performance of the prison oversight
286 coordinator's duties.
287 (3) Upon receipt of confidential or privileged
288 information protected from disclosure by state or federal law,
289 the office of prison oversight coordinator shall maintain the
290 confidentiality of the information and shall not further
291 disclose or disseminate the information except as authorized
292 by law. All records exchanged and communications between the
293 office of prison oversight coordinator and the Department of
294 Corrections are confidential and exempt from public
295 disclosure.
296 (4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
297 contrary, the prison oversight coordinator reasonably may
298 disclose to the appropriate department official confidential
299 information if necessary, and only to the extent required, to
300 reduce, stop, or prevent imminent danger or harm to an inmate,
301 staff member, or third party.
302 Section 4. (a) The prison oversight coordinator may
303 initiate and attempt to resolve an investigation upon its own
304 initiative, or upon receipt of a complaint from an
305 incarcerated person, a family member, a representative of an
306 incarcerated person, a Department of Corrections employee or
307 contractor, or others, regarding any of the following that may
308 adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of
Page 11

adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of
SB316 INTRODUCED
309 incarcerated people or correctional staff:
310 (1) Abuse or neglect.
311 (2) Conditions of confinement.
312 (3) Department of Corrections decisions or
313 administrative actions.
314 (4) Department of Corrections inactions or omissions.
315 (5) Department of Corrections policies, rules, or
316 procedures.
317 (6) Alleged violations of law by Department of
318 Corrections employees or contractors that may adversely affect
319 the health, safety, welfare, and rights of incarcerated
320 people.
321 (b) The prison oversight coordinator shall have
322 discretion whether to investigate or decline to investigate
323 any complaint. If the prison oversight coordinator does not
324 investigate a complaint, the prison oversight coordinator
325 shall notify the complainant in writing of the decision not to
326 investigate the reasons for the decision.
327 (c) The prison oversight coordinator may not
328 investigate any complaints relating to an inmate's underlying
329 criminal conviction.
330 (d) The prison oversight coordinator may not
331 investigate a complaint from a Department of Corrections
332 employee or contractor that relates to the employee or
333 contractor's employment relationship with the department
334 unless the complaint is related to the health, safety,
335 welfare, and rehabilitation of inmates or correctional staff.
336 (e) The prison oversight coordinator may refer a
Page 12

(e) The prison oversight coordinator may refer a
SB316 INTRODUCED
337 complaint to the appropriate resources or state agencies.
338 (f) The prison oversight coordinator may not levy any
339 fees for the submission or investigation of complaints.
340 (g) At the conclusion of an investigation of a
341 complaint, the prison oversight coordinator shall render a
342 public decision on the merits of the complaint, except that
343 the documents supporting the decision are subject to the
344 confidentiality provision of this section. The prison
345 oversight coordinator must communicate the decision to the
346 complainant, if any, and to the Department of Corrections. The
347 prison oversight coordinator must state its recommendations
348 and provide reasoning if, in the prison oversight
349 coordinator's opinion, the department or any employee or
350 contractor thereof should do any of the following:
351 (1) Consider the matter further.
352 (2) Modify or cancel any action.
353 (3) Alter a rule, practice, or ruling.
354 (4) Explain in detail the administrative action in
355 question.
356 (5) Rectify an omission.
357 (h) If the prison oversight coordinator so requests,
358 the department must, within the time specified, inform the
359 prison oversight coordinator in writing about any action taken
360 on the recommendations or the reasons for not complying with
361 the recommendations.
362 (i) If the prison oversight coordinator believes, based
363 on the investigation, that there has been or continues to be a
364 significant health, safety, welfare, or rehabilitative issue,
Page 13

significant health, safety, welfare, or rehabilitative issue,
SB316 INTRODUCED
365 the prison oversight coordinator must report the finding to
366 the Governor, the Attorney General, the Joint Prison Oversight
367 Committee, and the Commissioner of the Department of
368 Corrections.
369 (j) In the event that the department conducts an
370 internal disciplinary investigation and review of one or more
371 of its staff members as a result of an office investigation,
372 the department's disciplinary review may be subject to
373 additional review and investigation by the prison oversight
374 coordinator to ensure a fair and objective process.
375 (k) Before announcing a conclusion or recommendation
376 that directly or indirectly criticizes an individual or the
377 department, the prison oversight coordinator shall consult
378 with that individual or the department. The prison oversight
379 coordinator may request to be notified by the department,
380 within a specified time, of any action taken on any
381 recommendation presented.
382 (l) The department and its employees and contractors
383 shall not discharge, retaliate against, or in any manner
384 discriminate against any individual because the individual has
385 filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted
386 any proceeding under or related to this subsection.
387 (1) Any alleged discharge, retaliation against, or
388 discrimination against a complainant may be considered by the
389 prison oversight coordinator as an appropriate subject of an
390 investigation.
391 (2) Any department employee or contractor who believes
392 that he or she has been discharged or otherwise discriminated
Page 14

that he or she has been discharged or otherwise discriminated
SB316 INTRODUCED
393 against by any individual in violation of this subsection,
394 within 30 days after the violation occurs, shall be eligible
395 to file a wrongful termination action in the circuit court.
396 Section 5. (a) An employee or contractor of the
397 department shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner
398 against any agency, institution, employee, subcontractor,
399 inmate or inmate's family member, volunteer, or other
400 individual who provides information in good faith to the
401 prison oversight coordinator or willfully interfere with the
402 prison oversight coordinator in the performance of its
403 official duties.
404 (b) The department, an agency, or an individual may not
405 bring a civil action against the prison oversight coordinator
406 or any employee of the office of prison oversight coordinator
407 for the good faith performance of responsibilities under this
408 section.
409 (c) This section shall not affect the rights of the
410 department to supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee
411 for other justifiable reasons.
412 Section 6. (a) Not later than 180 days from the
413 effective date of this act, the Corrections Oversight Board
414 shall be established, consisting of the following members:
415 (1) Two members of the Senate, one of whom shall be
416 appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and one
417 of whom shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the
418 Senate. The President Pro Tempore shall select one of these
419 members to serve as co-chair.
420 (2) Two members of the House of Representatives one of
Page 15

(2) Two members of the House of Representatives one of
SB316 INTRODUCED
421 whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of
422 Representatives, and one of whom shall be appointed by the
423 Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. The Speaker
424 of the House of Representatives shall select one of these
425 members to serve as co-chair.
426 (3) The following members appointed by the Legislative
427 Prison Oversight Committee:
428 a. One representative of an inmate advocacy
429 organization.
430 b. One representative of an organization that provides
431 training or rehabilitation programs for incarcerated inmates.
432 c. One representative of a victim advocacy
433 organization.
434 d. One male who was formerly incarcerated in the
435 Department of Corrections.
436 e. One female who was formerly incarcerated in the
437 Department of Corrections.
438 f. One physician currently or previously holding a
439 license to practice medicine in the state.
440 g. One mental health or behavioral health professional
441 currently or previously holding a license in mental health
442 counseling, and has a background of providing mental health
443 services or counseling to incarcerated adults.
444 h. One individual who is a parent, grandparent, child,
445 sibling, or spouse of a currently incarcerated inmate of the
446 department.
447 (b) Members appointed pursuant to this section shall
448 serve three-year terms.
Page 16

serve three-year terms.
SB316 INTRODUCED
449 (c) The appointing authorities shall coordinate their
450 appointments to assure the oversight board's membership is
451 inclusive and reflects the racial, gender, geographic, urban,
452 rural, and economic diversity of the state.
453 (d) Members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall
454 not be current employees or contractors of the department;
455 shall not have parents, children, spouses, or domestic
456 partners who are current employees or contractors of the
457 department; and shall not have been an employee or contractor
458 of the department at any time during the 10 years prior to
459 their appointment to the board.
460 (e) The board shall convene upon any of the following
461 occurring:
462 (1) A majority of the members call for a meeting.
463 (2) One of the co-chairs call for a meeting.
464 (3) The board has an annual public hearing.
465 (f) Board members shall not be entitled to compensation
466 but shall be entitled to reimbursement of actual expenses
467 incurred that are directly related to the duties of serving as
468 a member of the board.
469 (g) The board shall hold at least one annual public
470 hearing each year to present, review, and discuss the office
471 of prison oversight coordinator's inspections, findings,
472 reports, and recommendations set forth in reports and shall
473 hold quarterly public hearings to present, review, and discuss
474 any other data, reports, or findings of the position the
475 oversight board deems relevant. There shall be made available
476 to the public an online comment submission form and
Page 17

to the public an online comment submission form and
SB316 INTRODUCED
477 opportunity to testify at any quarterly public hearings held
478 by the board.
479 Section 7. Employees of the Department of Corrections
480 shall report all violations of the law relating to prisons,
481 correctional facilities, and employees and inmates of the
482 Department of Corrections to the State Bureau of
483 Investigations. The bureau shall investigate all reported and
484 discovered violations and, where applicable, refer the
485 violations to the appropriate district attorney. All
486 indictments for violations shall be tried in the circuit court
487 of the county where the offense was committed.
488 Section 8. Each district attorney's office with a close
489 or medium security correctional facility in its circuit shall
490 be provided one special prosecutor to investigate and
491 prosecute criminal cases directed to the office.
492 Section 9. This act shall become effective on October
493 1, 2026.
Page 18